District of Columbia statutes.
44-1003.07

Notice to resident and resident’s representative; informal conference.

(a)

Before a resident is transferred or discharged under § 44-1003.05(a)(1) through (4), the Mayor shall provide the resident, the representative of a resident, and the Long-Term Care Ombudsman with a written notice stating the reasons for the intended action and informing them of their right to contest the transfer or discharge under § 44-1003.09.

(b)

Before the transfer or discharge, the Mayor shall hold an informal conference with the resident, the representative of a resident, and the Long-Term Care Ombudsman at which they may present objections to the proposed transfer or discharge plan and alternative placement.

History

Apr. 18, 1986, D.C. Law 6-108, § 307, 33 DCR 1510
Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-218, § 602(d), 36 DCR 534

Cross References

Long-term care ombudsman program, ombudsman duties, see § 7-702.04.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-702.04.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-1437.